Maryland, session 2026, HB0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 17 – Prince George’s County
10–192.01.
(a) (1) The governing body of Prince George’s County, by resolution, shall
impose a school facilities surcharge on new residential construction for which a building
permit is issued on or after July 1, 2003.
(2) (A) Except as provided under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,
the County Council may impose a school facilities surcharge on new residential
construction for which a building permit is issued on or after July 1, 2003, by a municipal
corporation in Prince George’s County with zoning authority and the authority to issue
building permits.
(B) The County Council may not impose a school facilities surcharge
on new residential construction for which a building permit is issued by a municipal
corporation if Prince George’s County has collected a surcharge on issuance of a County
permit for the same new residential construction.
(d) (1) (A) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (B) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE school facilities surcharge shall be paid by the seller at the time
a building permit is issued for the dwelling unit.
(B) THE COUNTY COUNCIL MAY DEFER PAYMENT OF THE
SCHOOL FACILITIES SURCHARGE UNTIL THE:
(I) FINAL INSPECTION OF THE NEW RESIDENTIAL
CONSTRUCTION;
(II) ISSUANCE OF A USE AND OCCUPANCY PERMIT FOR
THE PROPERTY; OR
(III) TIME OF CLOSING OF THE FIRST SALE OF THE
PROPERTY OCCURRING AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF THE BUILDING PERMIT.
(2) The school facilities surcharge may not be construed to be a settlement
cost.

HOUSE BILL 379 3
10–192.11.
(a) The Governing Body of Prince George’s County, by resolution, may impose a
public safety and behavioral health surcharge on new residential construction for which a
building permit is issued by the County unless a preliminary plan for the residential
development was approved on or before July 1, 2005.
(c) (1) (A) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (B) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE public safety and behavioral health surcharge shall be paid by the
seller at the time a building permit is issued for the dwelling unit.
(B) THE GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
MAY DEFER PAYMENT OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
SURCHARGE UNTIL THE:
(I) FINAL INSPECTION OF THE NEW RESIDENTIAL
CONSTRUCTION;
(II) ISSUANCE OF A USE AND OCCUPANCY PERMIT FOR
THE PROPERTY; OR
(III) TIME OF CLOSING OF THE FIRST SALE OF THE
PROPERTY OCCURRING AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF THE BUILDING PERMIT.
(2) The public safety AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH surcharge may not be
construed to be a settlement cost.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.